Hawaii statutes.
§806-72 Probation officers. Any
probation officer assigned to the courts may be placed in any correctional
facility to perform the probation officer's assigned duties. [L 1931, c 41, pt
of §4; RL 1935, §5538; RL 1945, §10844; RL 1955, §258-54; HRS §711-78; am L
1970, c 10, §1 and c 188, §39; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; am L 1973, c 179,
§25; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next